Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3128
Limitation of practice; board; duties.

The board shall ensure through rules and regulations and enforcement that psychologists limit their practice to demonstrated areas of competence as documented by relevant professional education, training, and experience.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 86;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,206.24;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1062.